Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-701.01
Act, how cited.

Sections 24-701 to 24-714 shall be known and may be cited as the Judges Retirement Act.

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 12;

Laws 1997, LB 624, § 10;

Laws 1998, LB 532, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 36;

Laws 2001, LB 408, § 7;

Laws 2002, LB 407, § 11;

Laws 2004, LB 1097, § 10;

Laws 2010, LB950, § 8;

Laws 2011, LB509, § 9;

Laws 2015, LB468, § 2.